Utah statutes.
39-6-83.   Mutiny -- Sedition.

(1)  A person subject to this chapter shall be punished as a military court directs, who:

(a)  with intent to usurp or override lawful military authority refuses, in concert with any other person, to obey orders or otherwise do his duty, or creates any violence or disturbance is guilty of mutiny;

(b)  with intent to cause the overthrow or destruction of lawful civil authority creates, in concert with any other person, revolt, violence, or other disturbance against that authority is guilty of sedition; and

(c)  fails to do his utmost to prevent and suppress a mutiny or sedition being committed in his presence, or fails to take all reasonable means to inform his superior commissioned officer or commanding officer of a mutiny or sedition he knows or has reason to know is taking place, is guilty of a failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition.

(2)  A person who is guilty of attempted mutiny, mutiny, sedition, or failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition shall be punished as a military court directs.



Amended by Chapter 9, 1988 Special Session 2

